Hawaii statutes.
[§6E-36] Sand Island. The island on
the southwest side of Honolulu Harbor, Oahu, 21 degrees 18 minutes 30 seconds
north, 157 degrees 53 minutes 00 seconds west, city and county of Honolulu,
proclaimed Anuenue (also known as Rainbow Island) by memorandum 1969-4 of the
governor shall be named Sand Island. The name Sand Island shall be used on all
official state maps, documents, and correspondence. [L 1976, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next